New York, session 2025-2026, A7495.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 8 of the state finance law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 2-e to read as follows: 3 2-e. Implement the program authorized by federal law to encourage the 4 use of mass transportation; any state employee may by written request 5 duly filed with the state comptroller, elect to participate in the 6 program authorized by federal law to encourage the use of mass transpor- 7 tation. In the event an employee so elects, the personal income tax 8 benefits provided to such employee to the extent authorized by such law 9 shall immediately inure to such employee. The comptroller shall promul- 10 gate such regulations necessary for the implementation and adminis- 11 tration of the provision of this subdivision. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10754-01-5